Utah statutes.
26-1-7.1.   Committee procedures -- Adjudicative proceedings.

All committees created by Section 26-1-7 shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in their adjudicative proceedings.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

